Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 17. Orphan Site Remediation

§ 35-11-1701.
Orphan site remediation; account created.

There is created an orphan site remediation account. The director may expend funds contained within the account for the purpose of remediation of orphan sites and the performance of any other activity as defined in this article.

As used in this section, orphan sites means:

Sites where the department determines that there is no viable party that is responsible for causing or contributing to the contamination present at the site; and

Sites where the department has issued a no further action letter, and where there is a subsequent discovery of contamination which was present at the site when the no further action letter was issued but:

Was not known to the site owner or the department at the time the no further action letter was issued, provided that a comprehensive and complete site characterization was conducted by the owner;

Is not the result of activities conducted on the site after the no further action letter was issued; and

Does not constitute an imminent or substantial endangerment to human health or the environment which is being addressed by the holder of the no further action letter pursuant to a reopening of the no further action letter under W.S. 35-11-1610(b).

Spill sites, where the department determines that the person responsible for the spill cannot be identified, or where the department must take prompt action to prevent hazards to human health or the environment at a site where a responsible party fails to act promptly.

The department may expend funds from this account to conduct site evaluations and testing, evaluate remedial measures, select remediation requirements, and construct, install, maintain and operate systems to remedy contamination in accordance with a remediation work plan prescribed by the director for the orphan site.

The department may also expend funds from this account to pay for the orphan share of any removal or remedial action taken pursuant to the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Control And Liability Act (42 U.S.C. § 9601, et seq.), provided that:

The department has participated in negotiations for, and concurs with, the orphan share allocation amount for the action; and

Each responsible party to an action has agreed not to seek cost recovery from less than de minimus contributors in exchange for the state assumption of the orphan share cost.

Revenue to the account shall include such monies which may be deposited in the account for use in remediation of orphan sites. The liability of the state to fulfill the requirements of this section is limited to the amount of funds available in the account.

The department shall project an annual funding need for the identification, characterization, prioritization and remediation of contaminated orphan sites within the state and shall recommend a funding source adequate to meet the identified funding need.

In any case under paragraph (b)(iii) of this section where the department expends funds to remediate or contain contamination resulting from a spill, and where the department has identified a responsible party, the responsible party shall reimburse the department in an amount equal to three (3) times the expenditure from the account. The attorney general shall bring suit to recover the reimbursement amount required in this subsection where recovery is deemed possible.

The director may transfer funds in the account under W.S. 35-11-424(a) to the orphan site remediation account.

History.

Laws 2000, ch. 13, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2008, ch. 44, § 1; 2018 ch. 12, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, deleted “trust and agency” preceding “account” once in (a) and three times in (e).

The 2008 amendment,

in (f), deleted the former first and second sentences pertaining to various reporting requirements to the legislature and legislative committees, deleted “also” after “The department,” and inserted “within the state” following “orphan sites.”

Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2008.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (a), added the first sentence and substituted “the account for the purpose” for “the account under W.S. 35-11-424(a) for the purpose”; and added (h).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”